Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.142

Confidential license plates.

"Confidential license plates" and "undercover license plates" mean standard issue license plates assigned to vehicles owned or operated by public agencies. These license plates are used as specifically authorized under RCW 46.08.066.

[ 2010 c 161 s 111.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.